Utah statutes.
73-5a-204.   Application for approval.
(1)  If the submission of plans is not required by Subsection 73-5a-202(1) or
is waived pursuant to Subsection 73-5a-202(3), approval to construct, enlarge,
repair, alter, remove, or abandon the dam must be obtained by submitting an
application to the state engineer.
(2)  The application shall contain:
(a)  the location of the dam;
(b)  physical dimensions of the dam;
(c)  water rights attached to the dam; and
(d)  any other information or drawings as required by the state engineer to
evaluate the application.
(3)  Upon review, the application will be approved, rejected, or approved with
conditions.
